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PRE−CHECK
1.DIAGNOSISSYSTEM
(a) Check the warning lights and buzzer.

(1)Release theparkingbrake lever.
(2) When the ignition switch is turned ON, check that

the ABS warning lights come on for 3 seconds.
(3) Check the BRAKE warning light lights up when the

ignition switch is turned ON and the light goes off
when the engine starts.

(4)When 120secondshaveelapsedafter the ignition
switch was turned ON, depressing and releasing
thebrakepedalcontinuouslywith full stroke 15 − 20
timeswithin 10secs.,warning light lightsupand
buzzer sounds.

HINT:
If the indicator check result is not normal, proceed to trouble-
shooting for the ABS warning light circuit (see Pub. No.
RM616E,pageDI −395).

(b) Incaseofnotusinghand −held tester:
Check the DTC.
(1)Disconnect theshortpin fromthecheckconnector.

(2) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E
1

of the
check connector.

SST09843 −18020
(3) Turn the ignition switch to the ON position.
(4) Read the DTC from the ABS warning light on the

combination meter.
HINT:
If no code appears, inspect the diagnostic circuit or ABS warn-
ing lightcircuit (seePub.No.RM6 16E,pageDI −395).
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S Asanexample, theblinkingpatterns foranormalcode
andcodes 11 and2 1 areshownon the left.
(5) Codes are explained in the code table on page

DI−60.
(6) After completing the check, disconnect terminals Tc

andE
1
,and turnoff thedisplay.

If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time the low-
estnumberedDTCwill bedisplayed 1st.

(c) Incaseofusinghand −held tester:
Check the DTC.
(1)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(2)Read theDTCby following thepromptson the tes-

ter screen.
HINT:
Please refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for fur-
ther details.
(d) Incaseofnotusinghand −held tester:

Clear the DTC.
(1) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E

1
of the

check connector and remove the short pin from the
check connector.

SST09843 −18020
(2) Turn the ignition switch to the ON position.

(3) Clear the DTC stored in the ECU by depressing the
brake pedal 8 or more times within 5 seconds.

(4) Check that the warning light shows the normal
code.
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(5) Remove the SST from the terminals of the check
connector.

SST09843 −18020
(6) Connect the short pin to the check connector.

HINT:
Disconnecting the battery cable during repairs will not erase the
DTC in the ECU.

(e) Incaseofusinghand −held tester:
Clear the DTC.
(1)Hookup thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(2)Turn the ignitionswitch to theONposition.
(3)Operate thehand −held tester toerase thecodes.

(See thehand −held testeroperator’smanual.)

2. SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)
HINT:
If the ignition switch is turned from the ON position to the ACC
or LOCK position during test mode, DTC will be erased.
(a) Incaseofusinghand −held tester:

Check the sensor signal.
(1)Turn the ignitionswitchOFF.
(2)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(3) Start the engine.
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(4) Check that the ABS warning light blinks.
HINT:
If the ABS warning light does not blink, inspect the ABS warning
light circuit.

(5) Keep the vehicle in the stationary condition on the
flat place for 6 sec. or more.

(6) Shift the transfer lever in the L4 position and turn the
center differential lock switch ON.

(7)Drive thevehiclestraightforward.
When driving the vehicle with the speed faster than
45 km/h (28 mph) for several seconds, check that
the ABS warning light goes off.

HINT:
The sensor check is not completed if the vehicle has its rear
wheels spun or its turned wheel steered during this check.

(8) Stop the vehicle.
(9) Check that the ABS warning light goes off when the

rear differential lock indicator light lights up or
flashes.

HINT:
While the rear differential is being locked, the ECU records DTC
C1248/48.

(10)Read theDTCby following thepromptson the tes-
ter screen.

HINT:
Please refer to thehand −held testeroperator’smanual for fur-
ther details.
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DTC of the sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area

C1271 / 71 Low output voltage in right front speed sensor
SRight front speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1272 / 72 Low output voltage in left front speed sensor
SLeft front speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1273 / 73 Low output voltage in right rear speed sensor
SRight rear speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1274 / 74 Low output voltage in left rear speed sensor
SLeft rear speed sensor
SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

C1275 / 75
Abnormal change in output voltage of right front speed
sensor

SRight front speed sensor rotor

C1276 / 76
Abnormal change in output voltage of left front speed
sensor

SLeft front speed sensor rotor

C1277 / 77
Abnormal change in output voltage of right rear speed
sensor

SRight rear speed sensor rotor

C1278 / 78
Abnormal change in output voltage of left rear speed
sensor

SLeft rear speed sensor rotor

C1279 / 79 Deceleration sensor is faulty
SDeceleration sensor
SSensor installation

C1282 / 82 Center differential lock position switch malfunction SCenter differential lock position switch

C1282 / 83 L4 position switch malfunction SL4 position switch

3. DECELERATION SENSOR OPERATION DIAGNOSIS
SYSTEM

CAUTION:
While checking the deceleration sensor operating diagno-
sis system, ABS does not work and the brake system
works as a conventional brake system.
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4. DECELERATION SENSOR CHECK
(a) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b) Connect VGS terminal to the batteries’ positive (+) termi-

nal, and GGND terminal to the batteries’ negative (−) ter-
minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VGS and GGND termi-
nals.

NOTICE:
Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VGS and
GGND.
(c) Check the output voltage of GL1 terminals.

Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL1 Lean forward 0.4 V to about 2.3 V

GL1 Lean rearward About 2.3 V to 4.1 V

HINT:
S If the sensor is tilted too much, it may show the wrong val-

ue.
S If dropped, the sensor should be replaced with a new one.
S The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be

placed upside down.


